incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
    <pardef n="κρ/όταφος__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>όταφος</l><r>όταφος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όταφο</l><r>όταφος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οτάφου</l><r>όταφος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όταφε</l><r>όταφος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όταφοι</l><r>όταφος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οτάφους</l><r>όταφος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οτάφων</l><r>όταφος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όταφοι</l><r>όταφος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="φουντο/ύκι__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ύκι</l><r>ύκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύκι</l><r>ύκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υκιού</l><r>ύκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύκι</l><r>ύκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύκια</l><r>ύκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύκια</l><r>ύκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υκιών</l><r>ύκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύκια</l><r>ύκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="δ/άπεδο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>άπεδο</l><r>άπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άπεδο</l><r>άπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>απέδου</l><r>άπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άπεδο</l><r>άπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άπεδα</l><r>άπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άπεδα</l><r>άπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>απέδων</l><r>άπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άπεδα</l><r>άπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="π/ίπα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ίπα</l><r>ίπα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπα</l><r>ίπα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπας</l><r>ίπα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπα</l><r>ίπα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπες</l><r>ίπα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπες</l><r>ίπα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιπών</l><r>ίπα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπες</l><r>ίπα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="σπ/όνδυλος__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>όνδυλος</l><r>όνδυλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδυλο</l><r>όνδυλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονδύλου</l><r>όνδυλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδυλε</l><r>όνδυλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδυλοι</l><r>όνδυλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονδύλους</l><r>όνδυλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονδύλων</l><r>όνδυλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδυλοι</l><r>όνδυλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="μολυβδα/ίνιο__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ίνιο</l><r>ίνιο<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνιο</l><r>ίνιο<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινίου</l><r>ίνιο<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνιο</l><r>ίνιο<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="πρ/όγραμμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>όγραμμα</l><r>όγραμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όγραμμα</l><r>όγραμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογράμματος</l><r>όγραμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όγραμμα</l><r>όγραμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογράμματα</l><r>όγραμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογράμματα</l><r>όγραμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογραμμάτων</l><r>όγραμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογράμματα</l><r>όγραμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="γίδι__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>α</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κ/ίνημα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ίνημα</l><r>ίνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνημα</l><r>ίνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινήματος</l><r>ίνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνημα</l><r>ίνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινήματα</l><r>ίνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινήματα</l><r>ίνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινημάτων</l><r>ίνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινήματα</l><r>ίνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="πτερ/ύγιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ύγιο</l><r>ύγιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγιο</l><r>ύγιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υγίου</l><r>ύγιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγιο</l><r>ύγιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγια</l><r>ύγιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγια</l><r>ύγιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υγίων</l><r>ύγιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγια</l><r>ύγιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="αδελφάκι"><i>αδελφάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αδερφάκι"><i>αδερφάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αλφάδι"><i>αλφάδι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αμαξάκι"><i>αμαξάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="γίδι"><i>γίδι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="δάπεδο"><i>δ</i><par n="δ/άπεδο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="θηκάρι"><i>θηκάρι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κίνημα"><i>κ</i><par n="κ/ίνημα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κατσικάκι"><i>κατσικάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="καφεδάκι"><i>καφεδάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="καφενεδάκι"><i>καφενεδάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κολοκυθάκι"><i>κολοκυθάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κρόταφος"><i>κρ</i><par n="κρ/όταφος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="λαστιχάκι"><i>λαστιχάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="λαχανάκι"><i>λαχανάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="λιονταράκι"><i>λιονταράκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="λοφάκι"><i>λοφάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="μαξιλαράκι"><i>μαξιλαράκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="μολυβδαίνιο"><i>μολυβδα</i><par n="μολυβδα/ίνιο__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="μουσούδι"><i>μουσούδι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πίπα"><i>π</i><par n="π/ίπα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="παιδάκι"><i>παιδάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πορτοκαλάκι"><i>πορτοκαλάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πρόγραμμα"><i>πρ</i><par n="πρ/όγραμμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πτερύγιο"><i>πτερ</i><par n="πτερ/ύγιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="σπανάκι"><i>σπανάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="σπυράκι"><i>σπυράκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="σπόνδυλος"><i>σπ</i><par n="σπ/όνδυλος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="τακουνάκι"><i>τακουνάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="τζίνι"><i>τζίνι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="φαρμάκι"><i>φαρμάκι</i><par n="γίδι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="φουντούκι"><i>φουντο</i><par n="φουντο/ύκι__n_nt"/></e>
